Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB537.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1 of the act of June 24, 1976 (P.L.424, No.101), referred to as the Emergency and Law Enforcement Personnel Death Benefits Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1. * * *(e.1) The Commonwealth shall pay out of the General Fund to a local tax authority on behalf of the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, the minor children of an individual who is a paid firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member or law enforcement officer, National Guard 1234567891011121314151617181920 member, certified hazardous material response team member, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol, volunteer firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member who died as a result of the performance of the individual's duty the total amount of property taxes owed for the primary residence of the deceased individual each year for the five years following the individual's death or until the primary residence is sold, whichever occurs first. The following apply to a benefit under this section:(1) If no spouse or minor children of the deceased individual survive, the benefit shall be paid to the local tax authority on behalf of the parents of the deceased individual for the total amount of property taxes owed for the primary residence of the deceased individual for the five years following the individual's death or until the primary residence is sold, whichever occurs first.(2) The surviving spouse, minor child or parents of the deceased individual shall be tasked with providing the department the tax bill showing the total amount of property tax owed.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0537PN0530 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122